Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-929
Director; rules and regulations; additional powers.

The director may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations and issue orders, rulings, findings, and demands as may be necessary to carry out the purposes of the Delayed Deposit Services Licensing Act.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 29.